Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 341 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any person suspected of fraudulently obtaining or attempting to obtain any benefit under this chapter, or
under any unemployment insurance law of any other state or the federal government, shall be referred by
the cabinet to the Kentucky Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the appropriate county attorney or
Commonwealth's attorney, and, if applicable, the United States Department of Justice. The referral shall
include:
(a) The name of the applicable employer, employee, claimant, and name used in the suspected fraud;
(b) Any contact information the cabinet possesses for the suspected fraudulent actor; and
(c) Any information filed with or reported to the cabinet regarding the suspected fraud.
(2) The cabinet shall make the referral under subsection (1) of this section no later than thirty (30) days after
determining suspected fraud has occurred.
(3) A legal disposition finding the employee or contractor guilty under the evidentiary standard and burden of
proof pursuant to KRS 500.070 shall be required to terminate employment under this section.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version